Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2397.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6761YH (4) 91 ss/ns H.F. 2397 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 27A.12 Release and return of 1 citizens. 2 The governor shall, in cooperation with the attorney 3 general, take all steps necessary to secure the return of 4 all citizens of the United States who are residents of this 5 state and who have been unlawfully deported, and to secure the 6 release of all citizens of the United States who are residents 7 of this state and who have been unlawfully detained, by United 8 States immigration and customs enforcement. 9 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 27A.13 Civil action authorized ââ 10 damages. 11 A person may bring a civil action in this state against 12 United States immigration and customs enforcement for damages 13 arising from injuries and violations of human rights arising 14 from the actions of the agency in this state. 15